Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF264.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 2316YH (2) 91 je/jh H.F. 264 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 262.29 Annual board review of 1 general fund appropriations to institutions ââ abrogation of 2 board authority. 3 1. For purposes of this section: 4 a. âAuthorityâ includes but is not limited to authority, 5 whether express or implied, over management, budgets, spending 6 of funds, programs and curriculum, employment matters, public 7 relations and communication, legal or contractual matters, sale 8 of goods or property, or infrastructure. 9 b. âInstitutionâ means an institution specified in section 10 262.7, subsections 1 through 3. 11 2. No later than August 1 of each fiscal year, the state 12 board of regents shall complete a review of the amount of funds 13 appropriated from the general fund of the state to the three 14 institutions for the fiscal year. As part of the review, 15 the board shall determine if the total amount of such funds 16 equals or exceeds fifty-two percent of the combined projected 17 operating costs of the institutions for the fiscal year. The 18 board shall publish the results of the review and the boardâs 19 determination on the boardâs internet site and provide the 20 results and determination in writing to the president of each 21 institution no later than August 1 of each fiscal year. 22 3. a. If the board determines that the total amount of 23 funds appropriated from the general fund of the state to the 24 three institutions for the fiscal year is less than fifty-two 25 percent of the combined projected operating costs of the 26 institutions for the fiscal year, the provisions of paragraph 27 âbâ shall apply for the fiscal year. 28 b. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, 29 upon publication of the results of the review and the 30 boardâs determination as required by subsection 2, all 31 authority provided by law or policy to the board over the 32 three institutions in any respect is fully abrogated for the 33 remainder of the fiscal year. Such authority with respect to 34 each institution shall instead be exercised by that institution 35 -1- LSB 2316YH (2) 91 je/jh 1/ 2 H.F. 264 as though any applicable law or policy provided such authority 1 directly to the institution. The board shall reassume all such 2 authority on July 1 of the next fiscal year. 3